Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-160
Department of Administrative Services; real property; purchases authorized.

The Department of Administrative Services may purchase real property needed by the state which costs an amount equal to or less than ten percent of the amount set forth in subdivision (1)(a) of section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43 without legislative approval or a specific appropriation for such purchase unless the purchase is made to evade the dollar limitation in this section and additional unapproved purchases will be made which, when considered together, would exceed the dollar limitation.

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 29;

Laws 2017, LB320, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2022, § 81-1119;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 38.
July 19, 2024